Utah statutes.
53-2-102.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Attack" means a nuclear, conventional, biological, or chemical warfare action against the United States of America or this state.

(2)  "Director" means the division director appointed under Section 53-2-103.

(3)  "Disaster" means a situation causing, or threatening to cause, widespread damage, social disruption, or injury or loss of life or property resulting from attack, internal disturbance, natural phenomena, or technological hazard.

(4)  "Division" means the Division of Emergency Management created in Section 53-2-103.

(5)  "Energy" includes the energy resources defined in Section 63K-2-103.

(6)  "Expenses" means actual labor costs of government and volunteer personnel, including workers' compensation benefits, fringe benefits, administrative overhead, cost of equipment, cost of equipment operation, cost of materials, and the cost of any contract labor and materials.

(7)  "Hazardous materials emergency" means a sudden and unexpected release of any substance that because of its quantity, concentration, or physical, chemical, or infectious characteristics presents a direct and immediate threat to public safety or the environment and requires immediate action to mitigate the threat.

(8)  "Internal disturbance" means a riot, prison break, terrorism, or strike.

(9)  "Natural phenomena" means any earthquake, tornado, storm, flood, landslide, avalanche, forest or range fire, drought, or epidemic.

(10)  "State of emergency" means a condition in any part of this state that requires state government emergency assistance to supplement the local efforts of the affected political subdivision to save lives and to protect property, public health, welfare, or safety in the event of a disaster, or to avoid or reduce the threat of a disaster.

(11)  "Technological hazard" means any hazardous materials accident, mine accident, train derailment, air crash, radiation incident, pollution, structural fire, or explosion.

(12)  "Terrorism" means activities that:

(a)  involve acts dangerous to human life;

(b)  are a violation of the criminal laws of the United States or of this state; and

(c)  to a reasonable person, would appear to be intended to:

(i)  intimidate or coerce a civilian population;

(ii)  influence the policy of a government by intimidation or coercion; or

(iii)  affect the conduct of a government by mass destruction, assassination, or kidnapping.

